src/fst/morphology/ext-github_kristiank/data/giellatekno/gt-norm-yamls/N-kwikk_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

# This gold standard is automatically generated from the Votic dictionary
# at Språkbanken (https://spraakbanken.gu.se/karp/#?mode=votiska)

Tests:
  Noun - kõikk :   # should decline like the paradigm 'asKõikk'
    kõikk+N+Sg+Nom: kõikk
    kõikk+N+Pl+Nom: kõikõd
    kõikk+N+Sg+Gen: kõikõ
    kõikk+N+Pl+Gen: [kõikki, kõikkijõ]
    kõikk+N+Sg+Par: [kõikka, kõikkaa]
    kõikk+N+Pl+Par: [kõikkia, kõikkitõ]
    kõikk+N+Sg+Ill: [kõikkaa, kõikkasõ]
    kõikk+N+Pl+Ill: [kõikki, kõikkisõ]
    kõikk+N+Sg+Ine: kõikõz
    kõikk+N+Pl+Ine: kõikkiz
    kõikk+N+Sg+Ela: kõikõssõ
    kõikk+N+Pl+Ela: kõikkissõ
    kõikk+N+Sg+All: kõikõllõ
    kõikk+N+Pl+All: kõikkillõ
    kõikk+N+Sg+Ade: kõikõl
    kõikk+N+Pl+Ade: kõikkil
    kõikk+N+Sg+Abl: kõikõltõ
    kõikk+N+Pl+Abl: kõikkiltõ
    kõikk+N+Sg+Tra: kõikõssi
    kõikk+N+Pl+Tra: kõikkissi
    kõikk+N+Sg+Ter: kõikkassaa
    kõikk+N+Pl+Ter: kõikkissaa
    kõikk+N+Sg+Com: kõikaka
    kõikk+N+Pl+Com: kõikkika
